Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 36. new text end new text begin Wages paid during a shutdown period. new text end new text begin The amount of wages paid on which no tax is deducted and withheld under section 290.994, subdivision 2, is a subtraction. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [290.994] NO TAX IMPOSED DURING SHUTDOWN PERIOD. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) As used in this section, the definitions in paragraphs (b) and (c) have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Consumption tax" means a tax imposed under section 295, 296A, 297A, 297B, 297E, 297F, 297G, or 297H. new text end new text begin (c) "Shutdown period" means the time period beginning on July 1 of an odd-numbered year, during which legislation appropriating money for the general operations of any of the following divisions of government has not been enacted for the biennium beginning July 1 of that year: new text end new text begin (1) an executive agency; new text end new text begin (2) an office or department of the legislature, including each house of the legislature and the Legislative Coordinating Commission; or new text end new text begin (3) a judicial branch agency or department, including a court. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Tax on wages not imposed. new text end new text begin No tax shall be deducted and withheld on wages paid by an employer under section 290.92 on a day that falls within a shutdown period or ten days after that period. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Consumption taxes not imposed. new text end new text begin No consumption tax shall be imposed if the activity or transaction giving rise to the tax occurs during a shutdown period or three days after that period. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end